Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,296
State Claims Board; miscellaneous claims; powers.

The State Claims Board shall have the power and authority to receive and investigate miscellaneous claims against the state.

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 46.